North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 9. Certificate of Need.
§ 131E-184.
Exemptions from review. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall exempt from certificate of need review a new institutional health service if it receives prior written notice from the entity proposing the new institutional health service, which notice includes an explanation of why the new institutional health service is required, for any of the following:

To eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards as defined in federal, State, or local fire, building, or life safety codes or regulations.

(1a)

To comply with State licensure standards.

(1b)

To comply with accreditation or certification standards which must be met to receive reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act or payments under a State plan for medical assistance approved under Title XIX of that act.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 511, s. 1.

To provide data processing equipment.

To provide parking, heating or cooling systems, elevators, or other basic plant or mechanical improvements, unless these activities are integral portions of a project that involves the construction of a new health service facility or portion thereof and that is subject to certificate of need review.

To replace or repair facilities destroyed or damaged by accident or natural disaster.

To provide any nonhealth service facility or service.

To provide replacement equipment.

To acquire an existing health service facility, including equipment owned by the health service facility at the time of acquisition. A facility not currently licensed as an adult care home that was licensed as an adult care home within the preceding 12 months is considered an existing health service facility for the purposes of this subdivision.

To develop or acquire a physician office building regardless of cost, unless a new institutional health service other than defined in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. is offered or developed in the building.

Those portions of a proposed project which are not proposed for one or more of the purposes under subsection (a) of this section are subject to certificate of need review, if these non-exempt portions of the project are new institutional health services under

G.S. 131E-176(16)

.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review any conversion of existing acute care beds to psychiatric beds provided all of the following are true:

The hospital proposing the conversion has executed a contract with the Department’s Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, one or more of the area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse authorities, or a combination thereof to provide psychiatric beds to patients referred by the contracting agency or agencies.

The total number of beds to be converted shall not be more than twice the number of beds for which the contract pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall provide.

In accordance with, and subject to the limitations of

G.S. 148-19.1

, the Department shall exempt from certificate of need review the construction and operation of a new chemical dependency or substance abuse facility for the purpose of providing inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse services solely to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety. If an inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facility provides services both to inmates of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety and to members of the general public, only the portion of the facility that serves inmates shall be exempt from certificate of need review.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review a capital expenditure that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. if all of the following conditions are met:

The proposed capital expenditure would meet all of the following requirements:

Be used solely for the purpose of renovating, replacing on the same site, or expanding any of the following existing facilities:

Nursing home facility.

Adult care home facility.

Intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

Not result in a change in bed capacity, as defined in

G.S. 131E-176(5)

, or the addition of a health service facility or any other new institutional health service other than that allowed in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b.

The entity proposing to incur the capital expenditure provides prior written notice to the Department, which notice includes documentation that demonstrates that the proposed capital expenditure would be used for one or more of the following purposes:

Conversion of semiprivate resident rooms to private rooms.

Providing innovative, homelike residential dining spaces, such as cafes, kitchenettes, or private dining areas to accommodate residents and their families or visitors.

Renovating, replacing, or expanding residential living or common areas to improve the quality of life of residents.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review the purchase of any replacement equipment that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in G.S. 131E-176(22a) if all of the following conditions are met:

The equipment being replaced is located on the main campus.

The Department has previously issued a certificate of need for the equipment being replaced. This subdivision does not apply if a certificate of need was not required at the time the equipment being replaced was initially purchased by the licensed health service facility.

The licensed health service facility proposing to purchase the replacement equipment shall provide prior written notice to the Department, along with supporting documentation to demonstrate that it meets the exemption criteria of this subsection.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review any capital expenditure that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. if all of the following conditions are met:

The sole purpose of the capital expenditure is to renovate, replace on the same site, or expand the entirety or a portion of an existing health service facility that is located on the main campus.

The capital expenditure does not result in (i) a change in bed capacity as defined in

G.S. 131E-176(5)

or (ii) the addition of a health service facility or any other new institutional health service other than that allowed in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b.

The licensed health service facility proposing to incur the capital expenditure shall provide prior written notice to the Department, along with supporting documentation to demonstrate that it meets the exemption criteria of this subsection.

The Department must exempt from certificate of need review the acquisition or reopening of a Legacy Medical Care Facility. The person seeking to operate a Legacy Medical Care Facility shall give the Department written notice of all of the following:

Its intention to acquire or reopen a Legacy Medical Care Facility within the same county and the same service area as the facility that ceased continuous operations. If the Legacy Medical Care Facility will become operational in a new location within the same county and the same service area as the facility that ceased continuous operations, then the person responsible for giving the written notice required by this section shall notify the Department, as soon as reasonably practicable and prior to becoming operational, of the new location of the Legacy Medical Care Facility. For purposes of this subdivision, “service area” means the service area identified in the North Carolina State Medical Facilities Plan in effect at the time the written notice required by this section is given to the Department.

That the facility will be operational within 36 months of the notice.

The Department shall extend the time by which a facility must be operational in order to be exempt from certificate of need review under this subsection by an additional 36-month period if the person seeking to reopen or acquire the Legacy Medical Care Facility gives the Department written notice of extension within 36 months of the original notice of intent to acquire or reopen the Legacy Medical Care Facility. The written notice of extension must notify the Department (i) that the person has undertaken all reasonable efforts to make the facility operational within 36 months of the notice of intent, (ii) that, despite these reasonable efforts, the person does not anticipate the facility will be operational within that time, and (iii) of its intention that the facility will be operational within 36 months of the notice of extension.

A person seeking to operate a Legacy Medical Care Facility located in a development tier one or tier two area, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, may request an additional extension of time by which the facility must be operational in order to be exempt from certificate of need review under this subsection by providing an additional written notice of extension to the Department, delivered prior to the conclusion of the original 36-month extension period, affirming that the person has entered into a contract for the acquisition or reopening of the Legacy Medical Care Facility and that, pursuant to the terms of the contract, the facility will commence operations within 36 months of the conclusion of the original notice of extension. Upon receipt of this notice, the Department shall grant an extension of the time by which the facility must be operational that is sufficient to permit the acquisition or reopening of the Legacy Medical Care Facility as provided in the contract.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 37; 1993, c. 7, s. 7; 2001-424, s. 25.19(c); 2002-159, s. 41; 2009-145, s. 1; 2009-487, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2013-360, s. 12G.3(b); 2013-363, s. 4.6; 2014-100, s. 12G.1(a); 2015-288, s. 2; 2017-184, s. 7(a); 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxx); 2018-81, s. 3(b); 2018-145, s. 15; 2019-76, s. 20; 2021-180, s. 9E.4.

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until January 1, 2023. For the section as amended January 1, 2023, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 131E-184

.

§ 131E-184.
Exemptions from review. [Effective January 1, 2023]

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the Department shall exempt from certificate of need review a new institutional health service if it receives prior written notice from the entity proposing the new institutional health service, which notice includes an explanation of why the new institutional health service is required, for any of the following:

To eliminate or prevent imminent safety hazards as defined in federal, State, or local fire, building, or life safety codes or regulations.

(1a)

To comply with State licensure standards.

(1b)

To comply with accreditation or certification standards which must be met to receive reimbursement under Title XVIII of the Social Security Act or payments under a State plan for medical assistance approved under Title XIX of that act.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 511, s. 1.

To provide data processing equipment.

To provide parking, heating or cooling systems, elevators, or other basic plant or mechanical improvements, unless these activities are integral portions of a project that involves the construction of a new health service facility or portion thereof and that is subject to certificate of need review.

To replace or repair facilities destroyed or damaged by accident or natural disaster.

To provide any nonhealth service facility or service.

To provide replacement equipment.

To acquire an existing health service facility, including equipment owned by the health service facility at the time of acquisition. A facility not currently licensed as an adult care home that was licensed as an adult care home within the preceding 12 months is considered an existing health service facility for the purposes of this subdivision.

To develop or acquire a physician office building regardless of cost, unless a new institutional health service other than defined in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. is offered or developed in the building.

Those portions of a proposed project which are not proposed for one or more of the purposes under subsection (a) of this section are subject to certificate of need review, if these non-exempt portions of the project are new institutional health services under

G.S. 131E-176(16)

.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review any conversion of existing acute care beds to psychiatric beds provided all of the following are true:

The hospital proposing the conversion has executed a contract with the Department’s Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, one or more of the area mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse authorities, or a combination thereof to provide psychiatric beds to patients referred by the contracting agency or agencies.

The total number of beds to be converted shall not be more than twice the number of beds for which the contract pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection shall provide.

In accordance with, and subject to the limitations of

G.S. 148-19.1

, the Department shall exempt from certificate of need review the construction and operation of a new chemical dependency or substance abuse facility for the purpose of providing inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse services solely to inmates of the Department of Adult Correction. If an inpatient chemical dependency or substance abuse facility provides services both to inmates of the Department of Adult Correction and to members of the general public, only the portion of the facility that serves inmates shall be exempt from certificate of need review.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review a capital expenditure that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. if all of the following conditions are met:

The proposed capital expenditure would meet all of the following requirements:

Be used solely for the purpose of renovating, replacing on the same site, or expanding any of the following existing facilities:

Nursing home facility.

Adult care home facility.

Intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities.

Not result in a change in bed capacity, as defined in

G.S. 131E-176(5)

, or the addition of a health service facility or any other new institutional health service other than that allowed in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b.

The entity proposing to incur the capital expenditure provides prior written notice to the Department, which notice includes documentation that demonstrates that the proposed capital expenditure would be used for one or more of the following purposes:

Conversion of semiprivate resident rooms to private rooms.

Providing innovative, homelike residential dining spaces, such as cafes, kitchenettes, or private dining areas to accommodate residents and their families or visitors.

Renovating, replacing, or expanding residential living or common areas to improve the quality of life of residents.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review the purchase of any replacement equipment that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in G.S. 131E-176(22a) if all of the following conditions are met:

The equipment being replaced is located on the main campus.

The Department has previously issued a certificate of need for the equipment being replaced. This subdivision does not apply if a certificate of need was not required at the time the equipment being replaced was initially purchased by the licensed health service facility.

The licensed health service facility proposing to purchase the replacement equipment shall provide prior written notice to the Department, along with supporting documentation to demonstrate that it meets the exemption criteria of this subsection.

The Department shall exempt from certificate of need review any capital expenditure that exceeds the two million dollar ($2,000,000) threshold set forth in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b. if all of the following conditions are met:

The sole purpose of the capital expenditure is to renovate, replace on the same site, or expand the entirety or a portion of an existing health service facility that is located on the main campus.

The capital expenditure does not result in (i) a change in bed capacity as defined in

G.S. 131E-176(5)

or (ii) the addition of a health service facility or any other new institutional health service other than that allowed in

G.S. 131E-176(16)

b.

The licensed health service facility proposing to incur the capital expenditure shall provide prior written notice to the Department, along with supporting documentation to demonstrate that it meets the exemption criteria of this subsection.

The Department must exempt from certificate of need review the acquisition or reopening of a Legacy Medical Care Facility. The person seeking to operate a Legacy Medical Care Facility shall give the Department written notice of all of the following:

Its intention to acquire or reopen a Legacy Medical Care Facility within the same county and the same service area as the facility that ceased continuous operations. If the Legacy Medical Care Facility will become operational in a new location within the same county and the same service area as the facility that ceased continuous operations, then the person responsible for giving the written notice required by this section shall notify the Department, as soon as reasonably practicable and prior to becoming operational, of the new location of the Legacy Medical Care Facility. For purposes of this subdivision, “service area” means the service area identified in the North Carolina State Medical Facilities Plan in effect at the time the written notice required by this section is given to the Department.

That the facility will be operational within 36 months of the notice.The Department shall extend the time by which a facility must be operational in order to be exempt from certificate of need review under this subsection by one additional 36-month period if the person seeking to reopen or acquire the Legacy Medical Care Facility gives the Department written notice of extension within 36 months of the original notice of intent to acquire or reopen the Legacy Medical Care Facility. The written notice of extension must notify the Department (i) that the person has undertaken all reasonable efforts to make the facility operational within 36 months of the notice of intent, (ii) that, despite these reasonable efforts, the person does not anticipate the facility will be operational within that time, and (iii) of its intention that the facility will be operational within 36 months of the notice of extension.

A person seeking to operate a Legacy Medical Care Facility located in a development tier one or tier two area, as defined in G.S. 143B-437.08, may request an additional extension of time by which the facility must be operational in order to be exempt from certificate of need review under this subsection by providing an additional written notice of extension to the Department, delivered prior to the conclusion of the original 36-month extension period, affirming that the person has entered into a contract for the acquisition or reopening of the Legacy Medical Care Facility and that, pursuant to the terms of the contract, the facility will commence operations within 36 months of the conclusion of the original notice of extension. Upon receipt of this notice, the Department shall grant an extension of the time by which the facility must be operational that is sufficient to permit the acquisition or reopening of the Legacy Medical Care Facility as provided in the contract.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1030, s. 37; 1993, c. 7, s. 7; 2001-424, s. 25.19(c); 2002-159, s. 41; 2009-145, s. 1; 2009-487, s. 3; 2011-145, s. 19.1(h); 2013-360, s. 12G.3(b); 2013-363, s. 4.6; 2014-100, s. 12G.1(a); 2015-288, s. 2; 2017-184, s. 7(a); 2017-186, s. 2(xxxxx); 2018-81, s. 3(b); 2018-145, s. 15; 2019-76, s. 20; 2021-180, ss. 9E.4, 19C.9(sss).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective January 1, 2023. For the section as in effect until January 1, 2023, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 131E-184

.

§ 131E-185.
Review process.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 511, s. 1.

(a1)

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, there shall be a time limit of 90 days for review of the applications, beginning on the day established by rule as the day on which applications for the particular service in the service area shall begin review.

Any person may file written comments and exhibits concerning a proposal under review with the Department, not later than 30 days after the date on which the application begins review. These written comments may include:

Facts relating to the service area proposed in the application;

Facts relating to the representations made by the applicant in its application, and its ability to perform or fulfill the representations made;

Discussion and argument regarding whether, in light of the material contained in the application and other relevant factual material, the application complies with relevant review criteria, plans, and standards.

No more than 20 days from the conclusion of the written comment period, the Department shall ensure that a public hearing is conducted at a place within the appropriate service area if one or more of the following circumstances apply; the review to be conducted is competitive; the proponent proposes to spend five million dollars ($5,000,000) or more; a written request for a public hearing is received before the end of the written comment period from an affected party as defined in G.S. 131E-188(c); or the agency determines that a hearing is in the public interest. At such public hearing oral arguments may be made regarding the application or applications under review; and this public hearing shall include the following:

An opportunity for the proponent of each application under review to respond to the written comments submitted to the Department about its application;

An opportunity for any person, except one of the proponents, to comment on the applications under review;

An opportunity for a representative of the Department, or such other person or persons who are designated by the Department to conduct the hearing, to question each proponent of applications under review with regard to the contents of the application;The Department shall maintain a recording of any required public hearing on an application until such time as the Department’s final decision is issued, or until a final agency decision is issued pursuant to a contested case hearing, whichever is later; and any person may submit a written synopsis or verbatim statement that contains the oral presentation made at the hearing.

The Department may contract or make arrangements with a person or persons located within each service area for the conduct of such public hearings as may be necessary. The Department shall publish, in each service area, notice of the contracts that it executes for the conduct of those hearings.

Within 15 days from the beginning of the review of an application or applications proposing the same service within the same service area, the Department shall publish notice of the deadline for receipt of written comments, of the time and place scheduled for the public hearing regarding the application or applications under review, and of the name and address of the person or agency that will preside.

The Department shall maintain all written comments submitted to it during the written comment stage and any written submissions received at the public hearing as part of the Department’s file respecting each application or group of applications under review by it. The application, written comments, and public hearing comments, together with all documents that the Department used in arriving at its decision, from whatever source, and any documents that reflect or set out the Department’s final analysis of the application or applications under review, shall constitute the Department’s record for the application or applications under review.

(a2)

When an expedited review has been approved by the Department, no public hearing shall be held. The Department may contact the applicant and request additional or clarifying information, amendments to, or substitutions for portions of the application. The Department may negotiate conditions to be imposed on the certificate of need with the applicant.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 137(a).

The Department may extend the review period for a period not to exceed 60 days and provide notice of such extension to all applicants. For expedited reviews, the Department may extend the review period only if it has requested additional substantive information from the applicant.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1981, c. 651, ss. 9, 10; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991, c. 692, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 137(a), (b); 1993, c. 7, s. 8; 2005-325, s. 4.

§ 131E-186.
Decision.

Within the prescribed time limits in

G.S. 131E-185

, the Department shall issue a decision to “approve,” “approve with conditions,” or “deny,” an application for a new institutional health service. Approvals involving new or expanded bed capacity for nursing care or intermediate care for individuals with intellectual disabilities shall include a condition that specifies the earliest possible date the new institutional health service may be certified for participation in the Medicaid program. The date shall be set far enough in advance to allow the Department to identify funds to pay for care in the new or expanded facility in its existing Medicaid budget or to include these funds in its State Medicaid budget request for the year in which Medicaid certification is expected.

Within five business days after it makes a decision on an application, the Department shall provide written notice of all the findings and conclusions upon which it based its decision, including the criteria used by the Department in making its decision, to the applicant.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 137(c); 2019-76, s. 21.

§ 131E-187.
Issuance of a certificate of need.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 2009-373, s. 1, effective July 31, 2009.

(c)

The Department shall issue a certificate of need in accordance with the time line requirements of this section but only after all applicable conditions of approval that can be satisfied before issuance of the certificate of need have been met. The Department shall issue a certificate of need within:

Thirty-five days of the date of the decision referenced in

G.S. 131E-186

, when no request for a contested case hearing has been filed in accordance with

G.S. 131E-188

.

Five business days after it receives a file-stamped copy of the notice of voluntary dismissal, unless the voluntary dismissal is a stipulation of dismissal without prejudice.

Thirty-five days of the date of the written notice of the final agency decision affirming or approving the issuance, unless a notice of appeal to the North Carolina Court of Appeals is timely filed.

Twenty days after a mandate is issued by the North Carolina Court of Appeals affirming the issuance of a certificate of need, unless a notice of appeal or petition for discretionary review to the North Carolina Supreme Court is timely filed.

Five business days after the North Carolina Supreme Court issues a mandate affirming the issuance of a certificate of need or an order declining to certify the case for discretionary review if the order declining to certify the case disposes of the appeal in its entirety.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 2009-373, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-373, s. 1, effective July 31, 2009, and applicable to all final agency decisions made on or after that date, deleted subsections (a) and (b), and added subsection (c).

§ 131E-188.
Administrative and judicial review.

After a decision of the Department to issue, deny or withdraw a certificate of need or exemption or to issue a certificate of need pursuant to a settlement agreement with an applicant to the extent permitted by law, any affected person, as defined in subsection (c) of this section, shall be entitled to a contested case hearing under Article 3 of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. A petition for a contested case shall be filed within 30 days after the Department makes its decision. When a petition is filed, the Department shall send notification of the petition to the proponent of each application that was reviewed with the application for a certificate of need that is the subject of the petition. Any affected person shall be entitled to intervene in a contested case.A contested case shall be conducted in accordance with the following timetable:

An administrative law judge or a hearing officer, as appropriate, shall be assigned within 15 days after a petition is filed.

The parties shall complete discovery within 90 days after the assignment of the administrative law judge or hearing officer.

The hearing at which sworn testimony is taken and evidence is presented shall be held within 45 days after the end of the discovery period.

The administrative law judge or hearing officer shall make a final decision within 75 days after the hearing.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 46, as amended by Session Laws 2011-326, s. 23, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to contested cases commenced on or after that date.The administrative law judge or hearing officer assigned to a case may extend the deadlines in subdivisions (2) through (4) so long as the administrative law judge or hearing officer makes a final decision in the case within 270 days after the petition is filed.

(a1)

On or before the date of filing a petition for a contested case hearing on the approval of an applicant for a certificate of need, the petitioner shall deposit a bond with the clerk of superior court where the new institutional health service that is the subject of the petition is proposed to be located. The bond shall be secured by cash or its equivalent in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the cost of the proposed new institutional health service that is the subject of the petition, but may not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). A petitioner who received approval for a certificate of need and is contesting only a condition in the certificate is not required to file a bond under this subsection.The applicant who received approval for the new institutional health service that is the subject of the petition may bring an action against a bond filed under this subsection in the superior court of the county where the bond was filed. Upon finding that the petition for a contested case was frivolous or filed to delay the applicant, the court may award the applicant part or all of the bond filed under this subsection. At the conclusion of the contested case, if the court does not find that the petition for a contested case was frivolous or filed to delay the applicant, the petitioner shall be entitled to the return of the bond deposited with the superior court upon demonstrating to the clerk of superior court where the bond was filed that the contested case hearing is concluded.

Any affected person who was a party in a contested case hearing shall be entitled to judicial review of all or any portion of any final decision in the following manner. The appeal shall be to the Court of Appeals as provided in G.S. 7A-29(a). The procedure for the appeal shall be as provided by the rules of appellate procedure. The appeal of the final decision shall be taken within 30 days of the receipt of the written notice of final decision, and notice of appeal shall be filed with the Office of Administrative Hearings and served on the Department and all other affected persons who were parties to the contested hearing.

(b1)

Before filing an appeal of a final decision granting a certificate of need, the affected person shall deposit a bond with the Clerk of the Court of Appeals. The bond requirements of this subsection shall not apply to any appeal filed by the Department.

The bond shall be secured by cash or its equivalent in an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the cost of the proposed new institutional health service that is the subject of the appeal, but may not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and may not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); provided that the applicant who received approval of the certificate of need may petition the Court of Appeals for a higher bond amount for the payment of such costs and damages as may be awarded pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection. This amount shall be determined by the Court in its discretion, not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000). A holder of a certificate of need who is appealing only a condition in the certificate is not required to file a bond under this subsection.

If the Court of Appeals finds that the appeal was frivolous or filed to delay the applicant, the court shall remand the case to the superior court of the county where a bond was filed for the contested case hearing on the certificate of need. The superior court may award the holder of the certificate of need part or all of the bond. The court shall award the holder of the certificate of need reasonable attorney fees and costs incurred in the appeal to the Court of Appeals. If the Court of Appeals does not find that the appeal was frivolous or filed to delay the applicant and does not remand the case to superior court for a possible award of all or part of the bond to the holder of the certificate of need, the person originally filing the bond shall be entitled to a return of the bond.

The term “affected persons” includes: the applicant; any individual residing within the service area or the geographic area served or to be served by the applicant; any individual who regularly uses health service facilities within that geographic area or the service area; any person who provides services, similar to the services under review, to individuals residing within the service area or the geographic area proposed to be served by the applicant; any person who, prior to receipt by the agency of the proposal being reviewed, has provided written notice to the agency of an intention to provide similar services in the future to individuals residing within the service area or the geographic area to be served by the applicant; third party payers who reimburse health service facilities for services in the service area in which the project is proposed to be located; and any agency which establishes rates for health service facilities or HMOs located in the service area in which the project is proposed to be located.

History.

1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1182, s. 2; 1981, c. 651, s. 11; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1000, s. 1; 1987, c. 511, s. 1; 1991, c. 692, s. 8; c. 701, s. 3; 1993, c. 7, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 2005-325, s. 5; 2007-182, s. 1; 2009-373, s. 2; 2011-326, s. 23; 2011-398, s. 46.